Utah statutes.
10-8-66.   Offensive businesses -- Regulation of management and construction.

They may direct the location and regulate the management and construction of packing houses, dairies, tanneries, canneries, renderies, bone factories, slaughterhouses, butcher shops, soap factories, foundries, breweries, distilleries, livery stables and blacksmith shops in and within one mile of the limits of the corporation.

